Washington statutes.
RCW 19.174.030

Safety procedures—Requirements.

On or before July 1, 1994, with respect to an existing installed automated teller machine and night deposit facility in this state, and an automated teller machine or night deposit facility installed after July 1, 1994, the operator shall adopt procedures for evaluating the safety of the automated teller machine or night deposit facility. These procedures must pertain to the following:

(1) The extent to which the lighting for the automated teller machine or night deposit facility complies or will comply with the standards required by RCW 19.174.050;

(2) The presence of landscaping, vegetation, or other obstructions in the area of the automated teller machine or night deposit facility, the access area, and the defined parking area; and

(3) The incidence of crimes of violence in the immediate neighborhood of the automated teller machine or night deposit facility, as reflected in the records of the local law enforcement agency and of which the operator has actual knowledge.

[ 1993 c 324 s 3.]